Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
PART 5 Live Poultry Dealers, Brokers, and Market Operators

4-4-80.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Dealer” or “broker” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of buying live poultry of any kind for resale or in selling live poultry of any kind bought for the purpose of resale. Every agent acting for or on behalf of any dealer, broker, or poultry market operator is a dealer or broker, provided that any farmer acquiring poultry solely for the purpose of rearing and feeding such poultry as a part of his or her farm operations is not a “dealer” or “broker.”

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation, association, cooperative, or combination thereof.

“Poultry” means domestic fowl including, but not limited to, water fowl such as geese and ducks; birds which are bred for meat and egg production, exhibition, or competition; game birds such as pheasants, partridge, quail, and grouse, as well as guinea fowl, pigeons, doves, peafowl; ratites; and all other avian species.

“Poultry market operator” means any person engaged in the business of operating public auctions or sales of live poultry or of operating barns and yards for the containment of live poultry held for the purpose of auction or sale.

“Sales establishment” means any yard, barn, or other premises where live poultry is offered for sale, auction, or exchange.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 525, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 5/SB 364.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “pigeons” was substituted for “pidgeons” in paragraph (3).

4-4-81.
Infected or diseased poultry — Sale, auction, transfer, or movement; inspection; reports; diagnosis.

No dealer, broker, poultry market operator, or other person shall sell, auction, transfer, or move any poultry which is infected or exposed to a highly infectious or contagious disease or which has been placed under quarantine by the authority of the Commissioner. Until all such poultry has been inspected by a veterinarian approved by the Commissioner, no dealer, broker, or poultry market operator shall sell, auction, transfer, or move any poultry which has been infected, which is suspected of being infected, or which is likely to have been exposed to infection. Any such poultry shall be reported to the department. Representative specimens of such poultry shall be submitted to a state diagnostic laboratory for diagnosis.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 525, § 1.

4-4-82.
License requirement; records requirement; transportation equipment; disposal of dead poultry.

No poultry market operator shall engage in or carry on such business without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner. No poultry dealer or broker shall engage in or carry on such business without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner. There shall be a fee of $35.00 per annum for such license. Any fees collected pursuant to this Code section shall be retained pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

The license of any licensed dealer, broker, or poultry market operator violating this part or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this part shall be subject to revocation, cancellation, or suspension following a notice and hearing.

No dealer, broker, or poultry market operator shall buy, store, or otherwise receive any poultry without first recording the name and address of the person or persons from whom the poultry is received, the number and type of such poultry, and the motor vehicle license tag number of the vehicle used by the person or persons to transport the poultry. The dealer, broker, or poultry market operator shall also keep records of the name and address of the person or persons buying such poultry. These records shall be maintained for two years. All records shall be subject to review by the Commissioner or a representative or employee of the department.

Any dealer, broker, or poultry market operator who transports live poultry shall keep all cages, coops, trucks, and trailers clean and sanitary. All equipment used to transport live poultry shall be cleaned and disinfected after each use.

Each dealer, broker, and poultry market operator shall properly dispose of dead poultry in accordance with Code Section 4-5-5.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 525, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 216, § 1/HB 1213; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-15/HB 1055.

4-4-82.1.
Limitation on slaughter of live poultry.

No dealer, broker, poultry market operator, or employee or contractor thereof or any person acquiring live poultry from any of them shall slaughter, other than for humane euthanasia or disease control, any poultry that are on the premises of the dealer or broker or on the premises of a sales establishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-82.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 216, § 2/HB 1213.

4-4-83.
Quarantines; rules and regulations for disease control; confiscation, destruction, or disposal of diseased poultry, eggs, chicks, or stock.

In the control, suppression, prevention, and eradication of poultry diseases, the Commissioner or any duly authorized inspector or employee of the department acting under the authority of this part or any other poultry law of this state is authorized to quarantine any premises or any area when he shall determine that any poultry in such place or places is infected with a contagious or infectious disease, that the unsanitary condition of such place or places might cause the spread of such disease, or that the owner or occupant of such place or places has not observed sanitary practices.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations prescribing sanitary standards and requirements for the prevention, control, suppression, and eradication of poultry diseases in this state. Such regulations shall be no less adequate for the protection of the poultry industry and the public health than those regulations of the secretary of agriculture of the United States.

The Commissioner is authorized, in his discretion, to confiscate, destroy, or otherwise dispose of any poultry, hatching eggs, chicks, or breeding stock which is infected with any contagious or infectious diseases.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 525, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 4/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in the last sentence of subsection (b).

4-4-84.
Penalties.

Any dealer, broker, or poultry market operator who violates any provision of this part or any quarantine order issued by the Commissioner under the authority of this part or any other law of this state for the protection of the general public in the prevention of poultry diseases shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 525, § 1.